Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-45] Law officer of a general
court-martial. (a) The authority convening a general court-martial shall
detail as law officer thereof a commissioned officer who is a member of the bar
of the highest court of the State, or a member of the bar of a federal court,
and who is certified to be qualified for such duty by the state judge
advocate. No person is eligible to act as law officer in a case if the person
is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating
officer or as counsel in the same case.

(b) The law officer may not consult with the
members of the court, other than on the form of the findings as provided in
section 124A-64, except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and
defense counsel, nor may the law officer vote with the members of the court. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next